Florida, session 2026, SB1224.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âPresent subsections (2) through (5) of section 23 82.01, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3) 24 through (6), respectively, and a new subsection (2) is added to 25 that section, to read: 26 82.01âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 27 (2)ââFraudulent entryâ has the same meaning as in s. 28 817.537(1), regardless of whether the person who obtained 29 possession of the residential dwelling by fraudulent entry is 30 charged with or convicted of a criminal offense. 31 Section 2.âSection 82.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to 32 read: 33 82.02âApplicability.â 34 (1)âThis chapter does not apply to residential tenancies 35 under part II of chapter 83. 36 (2)âThis chapter does not apply to the possession of real 37 property under chapter 513 or chapter 723. 38 Section 3.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 82.03, 39 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 40 82.03âRemedies.â 41 (1)âA person entitled to possession of real property, 42 including constructive possession by a record titleholder, has a 43 cause of action against a person who obtained possession of that 44 real property by forcible entry, fraudulent entry, unlawful 45 entry, or unlawful detention and may recover possession and 46 damages. The person entitled to possession is not required to 47 notify the prospective defendant before filing the action. 48 (2)âIf the court finds that the entry or detention by the 49 defendant is willful and knowingly wrongful, the court must 50 award the plaintiff damages equal to double the reasonable 51 rental value of the real property from the beginning of the 52 forcible entry, fraudulent entry, unlawful entry, or unlawful 53 detention until possession is delivered to the plaintiff. The 54 plaintiff may also recover other damages, including, but not 55 limited to, damages for waste. 56 Section 4.âParagraph (f) of subsection (2) and subsection 57 (3) of section 82.036, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 58 82.036âLimited alternative remedy to remove unauthorized 59 persons from residential real property.â 60 (2)âA property owner or his or her authorized agent may 61 request from the sheriff of the county in which the property is 62 located the immediate removal of a person or persons unlawfully 63 occupying a residential dwelling pursuant to this section if all 64 of the following conditions are met: 65 (f)âThe unauthorized person or persons obtained possession 66 of the residential dwelling by fraudulent entry or are not 67 current or former tenants pursuant to a written or oral rental 68 agreement authorized by the property owner. 69 (3)âTo request the immediate removal of an unlawful 70 occupant of a residential dwelling, the property owner or his or 71 her authorized agent must submit a complaint by presenting a 72 completed and verified Complaint to Remove Persons Unlawfully 73 Occupying Residential Real Property to the sheriff of the county 74 in which the real property is located. The submitted complaint 75 must be in substantially the following form: 76 77 COMPLAINT TO REMOVE PERSONS UNLAWFULLY 78 OCCUPYING RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY 79 80 I, the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the real 81 property located at ........, declare under the penalty of 82 perjury that (initial each box): 83 1.â.... I am the owner of the real property or the 84 authorized agent of the owner of the real property. 85 2.â.... I purchased the property on ..... 86 3.â.... The real property is a residential dwelling. 87 4.â.... An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully 88 entered and are remaining or residing unlawfully on the real 89 property. 90 5.â.... The real property was not open to members of the 91 public at the time the unauthorized person or persons entered. 92 6.â.... I have directed the unauthorized person or persons 93 to leave the real property, but they have not done so. 94 7.â.... The person or persons obtained possession of the 95 residential dwelling by fraudulent entry or are not current or 96 former tenants pursuant to any valid lease authorized by the 97 property owner, and any lease that may be produced by an 98 occupant is fraudulent or was obtained fraudulently. 99 8.â.... The unauthorized person or persons sought to be 100 removed are not an owner or a co-owner of the property and have 101 not been listed on the title to the property unless the person 102 or persons have engaged in title fraud. 103 9.â.... The unauthorized person or persons are not 104 immediate family members of the property owner. 105 10.â.... There is no litigation related to the real 106 property pending between the property owner and any person 107 sought to be removed. 108 11.â.... I understand that a person or persons removed from 109 the property pursuant to this procedure may bring a cause of 110 action against me for any false statements made in this 111 complaint, or for wrongfully using this procedure, and that as a 112 result of such action I may be held liable for actual damages, 113 penalties, costs, and reasonable attorney fees. 114 12.â.... I am requesting the sheriff to immediately remove 115 the unauthorized person or persons from the residential 116 property. I authorize the sheriff to enter the property using 117 reasonably necessary force, to search the property, and to 118 remove any unauthorized person or persons. 119 13.â.... A copy of my valid government-issued 120 identification is attached, or I am an agent of the property 121 owner, and documents evidencing my authority to act on the 122 property ownerâs behalf are attached. 123 124 I HAVE READ EVERY STATEMENT MADE IN THIS PETITION AND EACH 125 STATEMENT IS TRUE AND CORRECT. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS 126 MADE IN THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY, 127 PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525, FLORIDA STATUTES. 128 129 ...(Signature of Property Owner or Agent of Owner)... 130 131 132 Section 5.âEffective October 1, 2026, section 817.537, 133 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 134 817.537âFraudulent entry of a residential dwelling unit.â 135 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âfraudulent entryâ 136 means entering into and taking possession of a residential 137 dwelling unit by making or causing to be made any false 138 statement in writing relating to the personâs identity, 139 financial condition, assets, or liabilities in any rental 140 application for a residential tenancy. The term includes, but is 141 not limited to, the following fraudulent practices: 142 (a)âPresenting forged, fictitious, or counterfeit documents 143 to the landlord of the residential dwelling unit, including, but 144 not limited to, a driver license, an identification card, a bank 145 statement, or a paystub. 146 (b)âExecuting a rental agreement, or taking possession of a 147 residential dwelling unit, while impersonating the person in 148 whose name the rental application is submitted to the landlord. 149 (2)âA person who commits the offense of fraudulent entry 150 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 151 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 152 Section 6.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 153 act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.